morphological-analyzer/english.lexc
! Olga Redko, Feb 2, @oredko
!!!english.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +V +ADJ +ADV +PastPart +Past +PresPart +3P +Sg +Pl +Comp +Supl

LEXICON Root

Noun      ;
Verb      ;
Adjective ;

LEXICON Noun

cat     Ninf;
city    Ninf;
fox     Ninf;
panic   Ninf;
try     Ninf;
watch   Ninf;
panda   Ninf;
bus     Ninf;
library Ninf;
mouse+N+Sg:mouse          #;
mouse+N+Pl:mice           #;
child+N+Sg:child          #;
child+N+Pl:children       #;
cactus  Ninf;
cactus+N+Pl:cacti         #;
octopus  Ninf;
octopus+N+Pl:octopi       #;

LEXICON Verb

beg    Vinf;
fox    Vinf;
panic  Vinf;
try    Vinf;
watch  Vinf;
walk   Vinf;
debate Vinf;
study  Vinf;
stop   Vinf;
nod    Vinf;
fold   Vinf;
make+V:make                #;
make+V+PresPart:making     #;
make+V+Past:made           #;
make+V+PastPart:made       #;
make^able:makable     ADJinf;
write+V:write              #;
write+V+PresPart:writing   #;
write+V+Past:wrote         #;
write+V+PastPart:written   #;
write^able:writable   ADJinf;
drink+V:drink              #;
drink+V+PresPart:drinking  #;
drink+V+Past:drank         #;
drink+V+PastPart:drunk     #;
drink^able:drinkable     ADJinf;
sneak   Vinf;
sneak+V+Past:snuck         #;
sneak+V+PastPart:snuck     #;

LEXICON Adjective

slow ADJinfcompsupl;
cool ADJinfcompsupl;
fine ADJinfcompsupl;
beautiful    ADJinf;
excellent    ADJinf;

LEXICON Ninf

+N+Sg:0   #;
+N+Pl:^s  #;

LEXICON Vinf

+V:0             #;
+V+3P+Sg:^s      #;
+V+Past:^ed      #;
+V+PastPart:^ed  #;
+V+PresPart:^ing #;
^able:^able ADJinf;

LEXICON ADJinf

+ADJ:0           #;
^ly:^ly     ADVinf;

LEXICON ADJinfcompsupl

+ADJ:0           #;
+ADJ+Supl:^est   #;
+ADJ+Comp:^er    #;
^ly:^ly     ADVinf;

LEXICON ADVinf

+ADV:0           #;
